Hawaii statutes.
§486K-4 Safe or security box for valuables;
limitation of liability for deposited valuables. (a) If the keeper of any
hotel provides a safe or vault in its office at the hotel for the safekeeping
of any valuables belonging to the guests of the hotel, and prominently posts a
notice in the room or rooms occupied by the guest stating that a safe or vault
is provided in which valuables may be deposited and if any guest neglects to
deliver valuables to the person in charge of the safe or vault, the keeper of
the hotel shall not be liable in any sum for any loss of valuables sustained by
the guest by theft or otherwise unless the loss is due to the negligence or
fault of the keeper of the hotel. If the guest delivers valuables to the
person in charge of the office for deposit in the safe or vault, the keeper
shall not be liable for any loss sustained by the guest by theft or otherwise
in any sum exceeding $500; provided that the keeper's liability is limited to
$500 only if:

(1) The keeper gives a receipt for the valuables on a
form which states, in type large enough to be clearly noticeable, that the
keeper is not liable for any loss exceeding $500 except by special agreement in
writing in which the keeper agrees to accept liability for losses in excess of $500;
and

(2) The loss is not due to the negligence or fault of
the keeper of the hotel.

The keeper may accept liability for losses in excess
of $500 by special agreement in writing between a guest and the keeper or the
keeper's duly authorized representative.

(b) If the keeper of a hotel provides a
security box in the room of any guest and prominently posts a notice stating
that a security box is provided in which valuables may be deposited and
explains the liability for losses therefrom, the keeper of the hotel shall not
be liable in any sum for any loss sustained by the guest unless the loss is due
to the negligence or fault of the keeper of the hotel. [L 1978, c 234, pt of
§3; am L 1981, c 83, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 2008, c 19, §64]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next